Tennessee statutes. Title 43 Agriculture And Horticulture
Part 4

Articles of Cooperative

43-38-401. Amendment of articles — No vested property rights conferred.

A cooperative may amend its articles at any time to add or change a provision that is required or permitted in the articles or to delete a provision not required in the articles. Whether a provision is required or permitted in the articles is determined as of the effective date of the amendment.

A member of a cooperative does not have a vested property right resulting from any provision in the articles or bylaws, including provisions relating to management control, capital structure, distribution, entitlement or purpose or duration of the cooperative.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 9.

43-38-402. Procedure for amending articles.

The articles of a cooperative shall be amended as follows:

The board by majority vote shall pass a resolution stating the text of the proposed amendment. The text of the proposed amendment and an attached mail ballot, if the board has provided for a mail ballot in the resolution or alternative method approved by the board and stated in the resolution, shall be mailed or distributed with a regular or special meeting notice to each member. The notice shall designate the time and place of the meeting for the proposed amendment to be considered and voted on; and

If a quorum of the members is registered as being present or represented by alternative vote at the meeting, the proposed amendment is adopted:

If approved by a majority of the votes cast; or

For a cooperative with articles or bylaws requiring more than majority approval or other conditions for approval, the amendment is approved by a proportion of the votes cast or a number of total members as required by the articles or bylaws and the conditions for approval in the articles or bylaws have been satisfied.

After an amendment has been adopted by the members, the amendment shall be signed by the chair, vice-chair, records officer, or assistant records officer and a copy of the amendment filed in the office of the secretary of state.

A certificate shall be prepared stating:

The vote and meeting of the board adopting a resolution of the proposed amendment;

The notice given to members of the meeting at which the amendment was adopted;

The quorum registered at the meeting; and

The vote cast adopting the amendment.

The certificate shall be signed by the chair, vice-chair, records officer or financial officer and filed with the records of the cooperative.

A majority of directors may amend the articles if the cooperative does not have any members with voting rights.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 9.

43-38-403. Filing of amendments.

A cooperative amending its articles of organization shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing articles of amendment setting forth:

The name of the cooperative;

The text of each amendment adopted;

The date of each amendment's adoption;

If an amendment was duly adopted by the board of directors without member action, a statement to that effect and that member action was not required; and

If an amendment was duly adopted by the members, a statement to that effect.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 9.

43-38-404. Restatement of articles.

A cooperative's board of directors may restate its articles at any time with or without member action.

The restatement may include one (1) or more amendments to the articles. If the restatement includes an amendment requiring member approval, it shall be adopted as provided in § 43-38-402.

If the board of directors submits a restatement for member action, the cooperative shall notify each member, whether or not entitled to vote, of the proposed members' meeting in accordance with § 43-38-512. The notice shall also state that the purpose, or one (1) of the purposes, of the meeting is to consider the proposed restatement and contain or be accompanied by a copy of the restatement that identifies any amendment or other change it would make in the articles.

A cooperative restating its articles shall deliver to the secretary of state the restated articles, setting forth the name of the cooperative and the text of the restated articles, together with a certificate setting forth:

Whether the restatement contains an amendment to the articles requiring member approval and, if it does not, that the board of directors adopted the restatement; or

If the restatement contains an amendment to the articles requiring member approval, the information required by § 43-38-403.

If the restatement contains an amendment to the articles, it shall be designated in the heading “Amended and Restated Articles”.

The restated articles must contain all the requirements of articles as set forth in § 43-38-203.

Duly adopted and restated articles supersede the original articles and all prior amendments to the articles.

The secretary of state may certify restated articles as the articles currently in effect without including the certificate information required by subsection (d).

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 9.

43-38-405. Court ordered plan of reorganization.

A cooperative's articles may be amended without action by the board of directors or members to carry out a plan of reorganization ordered or decreed by a court of competent jurisdiction under federal statute, if the articles after amendment contain only provisions required or permitted by § 43-38-203.

The individual or individuals designated by the court shall deliver to the secretary of state for filing articles of amendment setting forth:

The name of the cooperative;

The text of each amendment approved by the court;

The date of the court's order or decree approving the articles of amendment;

The title of the reorganization proceeding in which the order or decree was entered; and

A statement that the court had jurisdiction of the proceeding under federal statute.

Members of a cooperative undergoing reorganization do not have dissenters' rights, except as and to the extent provided in the reorganization plan.

This section does not apply after entry of a final decree in the reorganization proceedings, even though the court retains jurisdiction of the proceeding for limited purposes unrelated to consummation of the reorganization plan.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 9.

43-38-406. Effect of amendment on cause of action.

An amendment to the articles does not affect a cause of action existing against or in favor of the cooperative, a proceeding to which the cooperative is a party or the existing rights of persons other than members of the cooperative. An amendment changing a cooperative's name does not abate a proceeding brought by or against the cooperative in its former name.

Acts 2004, ch. 534, § 9.